Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1439.05
County Drug Law Enforcement and Education Fund Boards; legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the intent of section 28-1439.03 to foster cooperation among the County Drug Law Enforcement and Education Fund Boards in the state by encouraging boards which have no use for the funds to disburse the funds to boards in other counties.

Laws 1985, LB 247, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 5.